test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_N_INDEP_gwekishin_gt-norm.yaml
     Px2+gwekishin+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: gigwekishinmgobanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+Dub+3Obv: gigwekishinwdigan
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+Dub+3Pl: gigwekishinwdigag
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+Pret+3Obv: gigwekishinwbanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+Pret+3Pl: gigwekishinwbanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: gigwekishinwgobanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: gigwekishinwgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: gwekishinsiimindigan
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: gwekishinsiimindigag
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: gwekishinsiiminbanan
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: gwekishinsiiminbanag
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: gwekishinsiimingobanan
     gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: gwekishinsiimingobanag
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: gwekishinsiimdigan
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: gwekishinsiimdigag
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: gwekishinsiimbanan
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: gwekishinsiimbanag
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: gwekishinsiimgobanan
     gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: gwekishinsiimgobanag
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Obv: gwekishinsiiwdigan
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Pl: gwekishinsiiwdigag
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Obv: gwekishinsiiwbanan
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Pl: gwekishinsiiwbanag
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: gwekishinsiiwgobanan
     gwekishin+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: gwekishinsiiwgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: nigwekishinsiimindigan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: nigwekishinsiimindigag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: nigwekishinsiiminbanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: nigwekishinsiiminbanag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: nigwekishinsiimingobanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: nigwekishinsiimingobanag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: nigwekishinsiimdigan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: nigwekishinsiimdigag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: nigwekishinsiimbanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: nigwekishinsiimbanag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: nigwekishinsiimgobanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: nigwekishinsiimgobanag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Obv: nigwekishinsiiwdigan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Pl: nigwekishinsiiwdigag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Obv: nigwekishinsiiwbanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Pl: nigwekishinsiiwbanag
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: nigwekishinsiiwgobanan
     Px1+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: nigwekishinsiiwgobanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Obv: gigwekishinsiimindigan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Dub+3Pl: gigwekishinsiimindigag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Obv: gigwekishinsiiminbanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+Pret+3Pl: gigwekishinsiiminbanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Obv: gigwekishinsiimingobanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+1Pl+PretDub+3Pl: gigwekishinsiimingobanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Obv: gigwekishinsiimdigan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Dub+3Pl: gigwekishinsiimdigag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Obv: gigwekishinsiimbanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+Pret+3Pl: gigwekishinsiimbanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Obv: gigwekishinsiimgobanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+2Pl+PretDub+3Pl: gigwekishinsiimgobanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Obv: gigwekishinsiiwdigan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Dub+3Pl: gigwekishinsiiwdigag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Obv: gigwekishinsiiwbanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+Pret+3Pl: gigwekishinsiiwbanag
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Obv: gigwekishinsiiwgobanan
     Px2+gwekishin+Neg+Px3+PretDub+3Pl: gigwekishinsiiwgobanag
     
